Massachusetts, session 194th, S1836.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subdivision 4 of section 28 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (c) and inserting in
place thereof the following paragraph (c):-
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, each district, non-
commonwealth governmental unit, or educational collaborative as authorized by the provisions
of section four E of chapter forty, the employees of which have become, or which become
members of the state employees’ retirement system under the provisions of this subdivision or
any other previous act, shall remit to the state board of retirement as the employer's normal cost
as determined by the actuary, of benefits earned during each year by such employees who are
members of the state employees’ retirement system.
of 3

The actuary shall determine such cost as a percentage of the payroll of the district, non-
commonwealth entity or collaborative for such employees based upon the most recent actuarial
valuation of the state retirement system. The actuary may consider factors including types of
governmental unit, employee demographic information, and employee group classification to
help in the determination of said percentage. Said cost shall be paid monthly and deposited in the
pension reserve fund of the state employees' retirement system. The actuary shall review the
percentage determined in this paragraph at least every three years.
SECTION 2. Subdivision 4 of section 28 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so
appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(d) The state retirement board upon terms and conditions it may establish, may require a
participating employer governed by this sub-section, who fails to remit either its normal cost
amount as determined in paragraph (c), or the contributions made on behalf of employees who
are members of the Massachusetts State Employees’ Retirement System as required by section
22 of Chapter 32, by the first day of the second month following the work month, to pay an
additional amount equal to 10% of the total amount of delinquent contributions. The state
retirement board shall have the right to commence an action in contract for payment of
outstanding amounts determined to be due in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 28 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subdivision:-
(9) For the purposes of this section, “non-commonwealth governmental unit” shall mean
an employer as defined in section one of chapter 32 whose employees are not employees of the
commonwealth or an agency thereof, employed in a position in the service of the
of 3

commonwealth, and whose regular compensation is not paid by the commonwealth, eligible for
membership in the state employees’ retirement system and the requirements in connection
therewith.
SECTION 4. Reimbursements currently outstanding to the state retirement board under
paragraph (c) of sub-section (4) of section 28 of chapter 32 for calendar years 2013, 2014, and
2015 shall not be required.
Reimbursements currently outstanding to the state retirement board under paragraph (c)
of sub-section (4) of section 28 of chapter 32 for calendar years 2016 through 2024, inclusive,
shall be required and remitted under terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the board.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 3